Mississippi, session 2026, HB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Representatives of the Boy Scouts of America and the Girl Scouts of the United States of America shall be allowed the opportunity to speak with students at public schools and charter schools in the State of Mississippi about the civic involvement of the Boy Scouts and the Girl Scouts, and to explain how students may participate or join the Boy Scouts or the Girl Scouts. (2)  Before addressing the student body of a public school or charter school, the Boy Scouts and Girl Scouts shall submit a written request to the principal of the school to speak to the students enrolled therein.  The principal shall provide written approval to the requesting Boy Scouts or Girl Scouts representative of the manner, date and time for the Boy Scouts or Girl Scouts, or both, to speak with the students.  Additionally, the principal shall inform parents of the presentation at least three (3) days before its scheduled occurrence, and shall include the manner by which students will be addressed, as well as the date and time of the presentation. SECTION 2. (1)  For the purposes of this section, the term "water safety" means age-appropriate education intended to promote safety in, on, and around bodies of water and reduce the risk of injury or drowning. (2)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school shall provide, to a parent who initially enrolls his or her child in the school, information on the important role water safety education courses and swimming lessons play in saving lives.  The information must be provided electronically or in hard copy and must include local options for age-appropriate water safety courses and swimming lessons that result in a certificate indicating successful completion, including courses and lessons offered for free or at a reduced price.  If the student is eighteen (18) years of age or older, or is under the age of twenty-one (21) and is enrolling in adult education classes, the information must be provided to the student. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.